Hawaii statutes.
§667-2 Other mortgagees joined. All
prior and subsequent mortgage creditors, whose names are or can be discovered
by the party foreclosing a mortgage, shall be made parties to the action. [CC
1859, §1232; RL 1925, §2888; RL 1935, §4721; RL 1945, §12421; RL 1955, §336-2;
HRS §667-2; am L 1972, c 90, §9(b)]

Rules of Court

Parties, see HRCP rules 19 to 21.

Case Notes

See 5 H. 397.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next